Tennessee, session 114, HB2343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-711(a), is amended by deleting
the first sentence of the subsection and substituting:
Under policies adopted by the local board of education, a teacher must be
allowed personal and professional leave earned at the rate of two (2) days for each one-
half (½) year employed.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-205(a), is amended by deleting
"two (2) days" and substituting "four (4) days".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2343
012645
- 1 -